Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5733
Prohibited acts; penalties; act of employee or agent; how construed.

(1) A person who smokes in a place of employment or a public place in violation of the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IV misdemeanor for the second and any subsequent offenses. A person charged with such offense may voluntarily participate, at his or her own expense, in a smoking cessation program approved by the Department of Health and Human Services, and such charge shall be dismissed upon successful completion of the program.

(2) A proprietor who fails, neglects, or refuses to perform a duty under the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act is guilty of a Class V misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class IV misdemeanor for the second and any subsequent offenses.

(3) Each day that a violation continues to exist shall constitute a separate and distinct violation.

(4) Every act or omission constituting a violation of the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act by an employee or agent of a proprietor is deemed to be the act or omission of such proprietor, and such proprietor shall be subject to the same penalty as if the act or omission had been committed by such proprietor.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 18.